Utah statutes.
38-1-40.   Notice of intent to obtain final completion.
(1)  An owner, as defined in Section 14-2-1, of a nonresidential construction
project that is registered with the database, or a contractor of a commercial
nonresidential construction project that is registered with the database under
Section 38-1-33, shall file with the database a notice of intent to obtain
final completion as provided in this section if:
(a)  the completion of performance time under the original contract is greater
than 120 days;
(b)  the total original construction contract price exceeds $500,000; and
(c)  the contractor or owner has not obtained a payment bond in accordance
with Section 14-2-1.
(2)  The notice of intent described in Subsection (1) shall be filed at least
45 days before the day on which the owner or contractor of a commercial
nonresidential construction project files or could have filed a notice of
completion under Section 38-1-33.
(3)  A person supplying labor, materials, or services to an owner, a
contractor, or subcontractor who files a notice of intent in accordance with
Subsection (1) shall file an amendment to the person's preliminary notice
previously filed by the person as required in Section 38-1-32:
(a)  that includes:
(i)  a good faith estimate of the total amount remaining due to complete the
contract, purchase order, or agreement relating to the person's approved
labor, approved materials, and approved services;
(ii)  the identification of each contractor or subcontractor with whom the
person has a contract or contracts for supplying project labor, materials, or
services; and
(iii)  a separate statement of all known amounts or categories of work in
dispute; and
(b)  no later than 20 days after the day on which the owner or contractor
files a notice of intent.
(4) (a)  A person identified in accordance with Subsection (3)(a)(i) who has
complied with, or is exempt from, the provisions of Section 38-1-22, may
demand a statement of adequate assurance from the owner, contractor, or
subcontractor with whom the person has privity of contract no later than 10
days after the day on which the person files a balance statement in accordance
with Subsection (3) from an owner, contractor, or subcontractor who is in
privity of contract with the person.
(b)  A demand for adequate assurance as described in Subsection (4)(a) may
include a request for a statement from the owner, contractor, or subcontractor
that the owner, contractor, or subcontractor has sufficient funds dedicated
and available to pay for all sums due to the person filing for the adequate
assurances or that will become due in order to complete a construction
project.
(c)  A person who demands adequate assurance under Subsection (4)(a) shall
deliver copies of the demand to the owner and contractor:
(i)  by hand delivery with a responsible party's acknowledgment of receipt;
(ii)  by certified mail with a return receipt; or
(iii)  as provided under Rule 4, Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.
(5) (a)  A person identified in accordance with Subsection (3)(a)(i) who has
complied with, or is exempt from, the provisions of Section 38-1-32 may bring
a legal action against a party with whom the person is in privity of contract,
including a request for injunctive or declaratory relief, to determine the
adequacy of an owner's, with whom the demanding person contracted,
contractor's, with whom the demanding person contracted, or subcontractor's,
with whom the demanding person contracted, funds if, after the person demands
adequate assurance in accordance with the requirements of this section:
(i)  the owner, contractor, or subcontractor fails to provide adequate
assurance that the owner, contractor, or subcontractor has sufficient
available funds, or access to financing or other sufficient available funds,
to pay for the completion of the demanding person's approved work on the
construction project; or
(ii)  the parties disagree, in good faith, as to whether there are adequate
funds, or access to financing or other sufficient available funds, to pay for
the completion of the demanding person's approved work on the construction
project.
(b)  If a court finds that an owner, contractor, or subcontractor has failed
to provide adequate assurance in accordance with Subsection (4)(a), the court
may require the owner, contractor, or subcontractor to post adequate security
with the court sufficient to assure timely payment of the remaining contract
balance for the approved work of the person seeking adequate assurance,
including:
(i)  cash;
(ii)  a bond;
(iii)  an irrevocable letter of credit;
(iv)  property;
(v)  financing; or
(vi)  another form of security approved by the court.
(6) (a)  A person is subject to the civil penalty described in Subsection
(6)(b), if the person files a balance statement described in Subsection (3):
(i)  that misrepresents the amount due under the contract; and
(ii)  with the intent to:
(A)  charge an owner, contractor, or subcontractor more than the actual amount
due; or
(B)  procure any other unfair advantage or benefit on the person's behalf.
(b)  The civil penalty described in Subsection (6)(a) is the greater of:
(i)  twice the amount by which the balance statement filed under Subsection
(3) exceeds the amount actually remaining due under the contract for
completion of construction; or
(ii)  the actual damages incurred by the owner, contractor, or subcontractor.
(7)  A court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing party for an
action brought under this section.
(8)  Failure to comply with the requirements established in this section does
not affect any other requirement or right under this chapter.
(9)  A person who has not complied with, or is not exempt from, the provisions
of Section 38-1-32 may not be entitled to a right or a remedy provided in this
section.
(10)  This section does not create a cause of action against a person with
whom the demanding party is not in privity of contract.
